District of Columbia statutes.
47-1806.09d

Tax on residents and nonresidents; credits; lower income, long-term homeowner credit — Fraud.

(a)

If the Mayor determines, before the credit is allowed, that an application filed under § 47-1806.09b was filed with fraudulent intent, the Mayor shall deny the application.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

The remedies authorized by this section shall be in addition to any other remedy allowed by law.

Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 401(b), 49 DCR 1468
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 1172(e), 51 DCR 8441
D.C. Law 15-205 repealed subsec. (b) which had read as follows: “(b) If the Mayor determines, after a credit has been allowed against income taxes otherwise payable to the District, that an application filed under § 47-1806.09c was filed with fraudulent intent, the credit shall be canceled, the amount of the credit allowed shall be assessed against the applicant, and the amount assessed may be collected in the manner provided by § 47-412.”
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Lower Income, Long-Term Homeowner Credit Administration Temporary Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-179, September 8, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 9221).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Lower Income, Long-term Homeowner Credit Administration Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-421, May 10, 2004, 51 DCR 5174).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1172(e) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1172(e) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).